District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “LIHTC Rent Stabilization Exemption Clarification Temporary
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 205(a)(1) of the Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C.
Law 6-10; D.C. Official Code § 42-3502.05(a)(1)), is amended by striking the phrase “as defined
in section 206(f)(2)(A);” and inserting the phrase “as defined in section 206(f)(2)(A), or any rental
unit for which the housing provider receives tax credits pursuant to the Low-Income Housing Tax
Credit Program, as defined in section 2(5) of the Low-Income Housing Tax Credit Fund Act of
2004, effective April 8, 2005 (D.C. Law 15-299; D.C. Official Code § 42-2853.01(5));” in its
place.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2